Maryland, session 2026, SB2102.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
(Three–fifths of all the members elected to each of the two Houses concurring), That it be
proposed that the Maryland Constitution read as follows:
Article III – Legislative Department
3.
The State shall be divided by law into legislative districts for the election of members
of the Senate and the House of Delegates. Each legislative district shall contain one (1)
Senator and three (3) Delegates. [Nothing herein shall prohibit the subdivision of any one
or more of the legislative districts for the purpose of electing members of the House of
Delegates into three (3) single–member delegate districts or one (1) single–member
delegate district and one (1) multi–member delegate district.] EACH LEGISLATIVE
DISTRICT SHALL BE SUBDIVIDED INTO THREE (3) SINGLE–MEMBER DELEGATE
DISTRICTS.
4.
Each legislative district [shall consist of adjoining territory, be compact in form, and
of substantially equal population. Due regard shall be given to natural boundaries and the
boundaries of political subdivisions]:
(1) SHALL RESPECT NATURAL BOUNDARIES AND THE GEOGRAPHIC

SENATE BILL 2102 3
INTEGRITY AND CONTINUITY OF MUNICIPAL CORPORATIONS, COUNTIES, AND
OTHER POLITICAL SUBDIVISIONS TO THE EXTENT PRACTICABLE;
(2) SHALL BE GEOGRAPHICALLY CONTIGUOUS AND COMPACT AND
INCLUDE NEARBY AREAS OF POPULATION TO THE EXTENT PRACTICABLE;
(3) SHALL REFLECT COMMUNITIES OF COMMON INTEREST;
(4) MAY NOT ACCOUNT FOR HOW INDIVIDUALS ARE REGISTERED TO
VOTE, HOW INDIVIDUALS VOTED IN THE PAST, OR THE POLITICAL PARTY TO WHICH
INDIVIDUALS BELONG; AND
(5) MAY NOT ACCOUNT FOR THE DOMICILE OR RESIDENCE OF ANY
INDIVIDUAL, INCLUDING AN INCUMBENT OFFICEHOLDER OR A POTENTIAL
CANDIDATE FOR OFFICE.
[5.
Following each decennial census of the United States and after public hearings, the
Governor shall prepare a plan setting forth the boundaries of the legislative districts for
electing of the members of the Senate and the House of Delegates.
The Governor shall present the plan to the President of the Senate and Speaker of
the House of Delegates who shall introduce the Governor’s plan as a joint resolution to the
General Assembly, not later than the first day of its regular session in the second year
following every census, and the Governor may call a special session for the presentation of
his plan prior to the regular session. The plan shall conform to Sections 2, 3 and 4 of this
Article. Following each decennial census the General Assembly may by joint resolution
adopt a plan setting forth the boundaries of the legislative districts for the election of
members of the Senate and the House of Delegates, which plan shall conform to Sections
2, 3 and 4 of this Article. If a plan has been adopted by the General Assembly by the 45th
day after the opening of the regular session of the General Assembly in the second year
following every census, the plan adopted by the General Assembly shall become law. If no
plan has been adopted by the General Assembly for these purposes by the 45th day after
the opening of the regular session of the General Assembly in the second year following
every census, the Governor’s plan presented to the General Assembly shall become law.
Upon petition of any registered voter, the Supreme Court of Maryland shall have
original jurisdiction to review the legislative districting of the State and may grant
appropriate relief, if it finds that the districting of the State is not consistent with
requirements of either the Constitution of the United States of America, or the Constitution
of Maryland.]
Article IV – Judiciary Department

SENATE BILL 2102
14.
The Supreme Court of Maryland shall be composed of seven justices, one from the
First Appellate Judicial Circuit consisting of Caroline, Cecil, Dorchester, Kent, Queen
Anne’s, Somerset, Talbot, Wicomico, and Worcester Counties; one from the Second
Appellate Judicial Circuit consisting of Baltimore and Harford Counties; one from the Third
Appellate Judicial Circuit, consisting of Allegany, Carroll, Frederick, Garrett, Howard, and
Washington Counties; one from the Fourth Appellate Judicial Circuit, consisting of Prince
George’s County; one from the Fifth Appellate Judicial Circuit, consisting of Anne Arundel,
Calvert, Charles, and St. Mary’s Counties; one from the Sixth Appellate Judicial Circuit,
consisting of Baltimore City; and one from the Seventh Appellate Judicial Circuit,
consisting of Montgomery County. The Justices of the Supreme Court of Maryland shall be
residents of their respective Appellate Judicial Circuits. The term of each Justice of the
Supreme Court of Maryland shall begin on the date of the Justice’s qualification. One of
the Justices of the Supreme Court of Maryland shall be designated by the Governor as the
Chief Justice. The jurisdiction of the Supreme Court of Maryland shall be co–extensive with
the limits of the State and such as now is or may hereafter be prescribed by law.
EXCLUSIVE AMONG THE STATE COURTS, THE SUPREME COURT OF MARYLAND
SHALL HAVE ORIGINAL JURISDICTION: (1) TO ESTABLISH THE LEGISLATIVE
DISTRICT PLAN AND THE CONGRESSIONAL DISTRICT PLAN IN THE EVENT THAT A
PLAN IS NOT ENACTED UNDER ARTICLE XXI, SECTION 2 OF THIS CONSTITUTION;
AND (2) TO CONSIDER A PETITION SEEKING REVIEW OF THE LEGALITY OF A PLAN TO
ESTABLISH LEGISLATIVE OR CONGRESSIONAL DISTRICTS ENACTED UNDER
ARTICLE XXI, SECTION 2 OF THIS CONSTITUTION. It shall hold its sessions in the City
of Annapolis at such time or times as it shall from time to time by rule prescribe. Its session
or sessions shall continue not less than ten months in each year, if the business before it
shall so require, and it shall be competent for the justices temporarily to transfer their
sittings elsewhere upon sufficient cause. The salary of each Justice of the Supreme Court
of Maryland shall be that now or hereafter prescribed by the General Assembly and shall
not be diminished during the Justice’s continuance in office. Five of the justices shall
constitute a quorum, and five justices shall sit in each case unless the Supreme Court of
Maryland shall direct that an additional justice or justices sit for any case. The concurrence
of a majority of those sitting shall be sufficient for the decision of any cause, and an equal
division of those sitting in a case has the effect of affirming the decision appealed from if
there is no application for reargument as hereinafter provided. In any case where there is
an equal division or a three to two division of the Supreme Court of Maryland a reargument
before the full Court of seven justices shall be granted to the losing party upon application
as a matter of right.
Article V – Attorney–General and State’s Attorneys
3.
(a) The Attorney General shall:
(1) [Prosecute] EXCEPT FOR PROCEEDINGS TO ESTABLISH THE

SENATE BILL 2102 5
LEGISLATIVE DISTRICT PLAN AND THE CONGRESSIONAL DISTRICT PLAN IN THE
EVENT THAT A PLAN IS NOT ENACTED UNDER ARTICLE XXI, SECTION 2 OF THIS
CONSTITUTION OR A PETITION SEEKING REVIEW OF THE LEGALITY OF A PLAN TO
ESTABLISH LEGISLATIVE DISTRICTS OR CONGRESSIONAL DISTRICTS ENACTED
UNDER ARTICLE XXI, SECTION 2 OF THIS CONSTITUTION, PROSECUTE and defend
on the part of the State all cases pending in the appellate courts of the State, in the Supreme
Court of the United States or the inferior Federal Courts, by or against the State, or in
which the State may be interested, except those criminal appeals otherwise prescribed by
the General Assembly.
(2) Investigate, commence, and prosecute or defend any civil or criminal
suit or action or category of such suits or actions in any of the Federal Courts or in any
Court of this State, or before administrative agencies and quasi legislative bodies, on the
part of the State or in which the State may be interested, which the General Assembly by
law or joint resolution, or the Governor, shall have directed or shall direct to be
investigated, commenced and prosecuted or defended.
(3) When required by the General Assembly by law or joint resolution, or
by the Governor, aid any State’s Attorney or other authorized prosecuting officer in
investigating, commencing, and prosecuting any criminal suit or action or category of such
suits or actions brought by the State in any Court of this State.
(4) Give his opinion in writing whenever required by the General Assembly
or either branch thereof, the Governor, the Comptroller, the Treasurer or any State’s
Attorney on any legal matter or subject.
(b) The Attorney General shall have and perform any other duties and possess
any other powers, and appoint the number of deputies or assistants, as the General
Assembly from time to time may prescribe by law.
(c) The Attorney General shall receive for his services the annual salary as the
General Assembly from time to time may prescribe by law, but he may not receive any fees,
perquisites or rewards whatever, in addition to his salary, for the performance of any
official duty.
(d) The Governor may not employ any additional counsel, in any case whatever,
unless authorized by the General Assembly.
ARTICLE XXI – LEGISLATIVE AND CONGRESSIONAL REDISTRICTING AND
APPORTIONMENT
1.
EACH CONGRESSIONAL DISTRICT:
(1) SHALL RESPECT NATURAL BOUNDARIES AND THE GEOGRAPHIC

SENATE BILL 2102
INTEGRITY AND CONTINUITY OF MUNICIPAL CORPORATIONS, COUNTIES, AND
OTHER POLITICAL SUBDIVISIONS TO THE EXTENT PRACTICABLE;
(2) SHALL BE GEOGRAPHICALLY CONTIGUOUS AND COMPACT AND
INCLUDE NEARBY AREAS OF POPULATION TO THE EXTENT PRACTICABLE;
(3) SHALL REFLECT COMMUNITIES OF COMMON INTEREST;
(4) MAY NOT ACCOUNT FOR HOW INDIVIDUALS ARE REGISTERED TO
VOTE, HOW INDIVIDUALS VOTED IN THE PAST, OR THE POLITICAL PARTY TO WHICH
INDIVIDUALS BELONG; AND
(5) MAY NOT ACCOUNT FOR THE DOMICILE OR RESIDENCE OF ANY
INDIVIDUAL, INCLUDING AN INCUMBENT OFFICEHOLDER OR A POTENTIAL
CANDIDATE FOR OFFICE.
2.
(A) IN THIS SECTION, “REDISTRICTING COMMISSION” MEANS THE
LEGISLATIVE AND CONGRESSIONAL REDISTRICTING AND APPORTIONMENT
COMMISSION.
(B) THE PROVISIONS OF THIS SECTION AND ANY LAWS ENACTED TO CARRY
OUT THIS SECTION ARE THE EXCLUSIVE MEANS TO ADOPT ANY PLAN TO ALTER
LEGISLATIVE DISTRICTS OR CONGRESSIONAL DISTRICTS.
(C) (1) THERE IS A LEGISLATIVE AND CONGRESSIONAL REDISTRICTING
AND APPORTIONMENT COMMISSION.
(2) THE REDISTRICTING COMMISSION IS AN INDEPENDENT UNIT OF
STATE GOVERNMENT, ESTABLISHED BY LAW, CONSISTING OF MEMBERS WHO ARE
IMPARTIAL AND REASONABLY REPRESENTATIVE OF THE STATE’S GEOGRAPHICAL,
RACIAL, AND GENDER MAKEUP.
(D) IN THE YEAR FOLLOWING EACH DECENNIAL CENSUS OF THE UNITED
STATES, THE REDISTRICTING COMMISSION SHALL:
(1) DIVIDE THE STATE INTO CONSECUTIVELY NUMBERED
LEGISLATIVE DISTRICTS THAT CONFORM TO ARTICLE III, SECTIONS 2, 3, AND 4 OF
THIS CONSTITUTION; AND
(2) DIVIDE THE STATE INTO AS MANY CONGRESSIONAL DISTRICTS
THAT CONFORM TO SECTION 1 OF THIS ARTICLE AS THERE ARE REPRESENTATIVES
IN CONGRESS APPORTIONED TO THE STATE.

SENATE BILL 2102 7
(E) (1) LEGISLATIVE DISTRICTS SHALL BE AS NEARLY EQUAL IN
POPULATION AS PRACTICABLE BUT MAY NOT DEVIATE MORE THAN 2% IN
POPULATION BETWEEN LEGISLATIVE DISTRICTS.
(2) EACH DELEGATE DISTRICT SHALL BE AS NEARLY EQUAL IN
POPULATION AS PRACTICABLE BUT MAY NOT DEVIATE MORE THAN 2% IN
POPULATION BETWEEN THE OTHER DELEGATE DISTRICTS IN THE LEGISLATIVE
DISTRICT.
(F) THE REDISTRICTING COMMISSION SHALL:
(1) ADOPT ONE PLAN FOR LEGISLATIVE DISTRICTS AND ONE PLAN
FOR CONGRESSIONAL DISTRICTS;
(2) CERTIFY THAT EACH PLAN IS THE PLAN ADOPTED BY THE
REDISTRICTING COMMISSION; AND
(3) SEND EACH CERTIFIED PLAN TO THE PRESIDING OFFICERS OF
THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY.
(G) ON RECEIPT OF THE CERTIFIED LEGISLATIVE DISTRICT PLAN AND THE
CERTIFIED CONGRESSIONAL DISTRICT PLAN FROM THE REDISTRICTING
COMMISSION, THE PRESIDING OFFICERS SHALL INTRODUCE EACH PLAN
SEPARATELY FOR CONSIDERATION BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY.
(H) (1) UNLESS THE GOVERNOR FINDS THAT A SPECIAL SESSION IS NOT
REQUIRED, THE GOVERNOR SHALL ISSUE A PROCLAMATION CONVENING A SPECIAL
SESSION OF THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY TO CONSIDER THE PLANS REQUIRED TO BE
INTRODUCED UNDER SUBSECTION (G) OF THIS SECTION.
(2) DURING A SPECIAL SESSION CONVENED UNDER THIS
SUBSECTION, THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY:
(I) SHALL CONSIDER ONLY THE CERTIFIED LEGISLATIVE
DISTRICT PLAN AND THE CERTIFIED CONGRESSIONAL DISTRICT PLAN AND ANY
AMENDMENTS TO THE PLANS AUTHORIZED UNDER SUBSECTION (N) OF THIS
SECTION; AND
(II) MAY NOT CONSIDER ANY OTHER LEGISLATION, INCLUDING
BILLS THAT HAVE BEEN VETOED.
(I) THE PRESIDING OFFICERS SHALL INTRODUCE THE CERTIFIED

SENATE BILL 2102
LEGISLATIVE DISTRICT PLAN AND THE CERTIFIED CONGRESSIONAL DISTRICT PLAN
AT THE FOLLOWING TIME:
(1) IF THE GOVERNOR DOES NOT CONVENE A SPECIAL SESSION, ON
THE FIRST DAY OF THE REGULAR SESSION OF THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY IN THE YEAR
ENDING IN THE NUMERAL 2; OR
(2) IF THE GOVERNOR CONVENES A SPECIAL SESSION, ON THE FIRST
DAY OF THE SPECIAL SESSION.
(J) EXCEPT FOR THE PLANS REQUIRED TO BE INTRODUCED BY THE
PRESIDING OFFICERS UNDER SUBSECTION (G) OF THIS SECTION, A MEMBER OF THE
GENERAL ASSEMBLY MAY NOT INTRODUCE A BILL PROPOSING A PLAN FOR
LEGISLATIVE DISTRICTS OR CONGRESSIONAL DISTRICTS.
(K) EXCEPT FOR AN AMENDMENT PREPARED BY THE PRESIDING OFFICERS
UNDER SUBSECTION (N) OF THIS SECTION, A LEGISLATIVE DISTRICT PLAN OR A
CONGRESSIONAL DISTRICT PLAN MAY NOT BE AMENDED.
(L) (1) (I) DURING A REGULAR SESSION OF THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY,
EACH HOUSE OF THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY SHALL PASS A LEGISLATIVE DISTRICT
PLAN AND A CONGRESSIONAL DISTRICT PLAN BY A VOTE OF THREE–FIFTHS OF THE
MEMBERS ELECTED TO THAT HOUSE BY THE 45TH DAY AFTER THE OPENING OF THE
REGULAR SESSION.
(II) DURING A SPECIAL SESSION OF THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY,
EACH HOUSE OF THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY SHALL PASS A LEGISLATIVE DISTRICT
PLAN AND A CONGRESSIONAL DISTRICT PLAN BY A VOTE OF THREE–FIFTHS OF THE
MEMBERS ELECTED TO THAT HOUSE BY THE 15TH DAY AFTER THE OPENING OF THE
SPECIAL SESSION.
(2) THE LEGISLATIVE DISTRICT PLAN AND CONGRESSIONAL
DISTRICT PLAN PASSED BY THE HOUSE OF DELEGATES AND THE SENATE SHALL BE
PRESENTED TO THE GOVERNOR FOR APPROVAL WITHIN 1 DAY AFTER PASSAGE.
(M) (1) IF THE LEGISLATIVE DISTRICT PLAN OR THE CONGRESSIONAL
DISTRICT PLAN DOES NOT PASS BY THE DEADLINE ESTABLISHED UNDER
SUBSECTION (L)(1) OF THIS SECTION, OR THE GOVERNOR VETOES THE LEGISLATIVE
DISTRICT PLAN OR THE CONGRESSIONAL DISTRICT PLAN UNDER SUBSECTION (P) OF
THIS SECTION, THE PRESIDING OFFICERS OF THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY SHALL,
WITHIN 3 DAYS:
(I) NOTIFY THE REDISTRICTING COMMISSION THAT THE

SENATE BILL 2102 9
LEGISLATIVE DISTRICT PLAN OR THE CONGRESSIONAL DISTRICT PLAN DID NOT
PASS OR WAS VETOED;
(II) SEND THE REDISTRICTING COMMISSION THE
RECOMMENDATIONS OF THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY FOR CHANGES TO THE
LEGISLATIVE DISTRICT PLAN OR THE CONGRESSIONAL DISTRICT PLAN AND THE
GOVERNOR’S OBJECTIONS, IF ANY; AND
(III) REQUEST THAT THE REDISTRICTING COMMISSION
PROPOSE AN ALTERNATIVE PLAN.
(2) (I) ON RECEIPT OF THE NOTICE FROM THE GENERAL
ASSEMBLY UNDER PARAGRAPH (1)(I) OF THIS SUBSECTION, THE REDISTRICTING
COMMISSION SHALL REVIEW THE LEGISLATIVE DISTRICT PLAN OR THE
CONGRESSIONAL DISTRICT PLAN AND CONSIDER ANY RECOMMENDATIONS FOR
CHANGES TO A PLAN FROM THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY AND THE OBJECTIONS OF THE
GOVERNOR, IF ANY.
(II) THE REDISTRICTING COMMISSION SHALL SEND THE
LEGISLATIVE DISTRICT PLAN OR THE CONGRESSIONAL DISTRICT PLAN, INCLUDING
ANY CHANGES APPROVED BY THE REDISTRICTING COMMISSION, TO THE PRESIDING
OFFICERS WITHIN 20 DAYS AFTER RECEIVING THE NOTIFICATION OF THE GENERAL
ASSEMBLY UNDER PARAGRAPH (1)(I) OF THIS SUBSECTION.
(N) (1) WITHIN 3 DAYS AFTER RECEIVING THE LEGISLATIVE DISTRICT
PLAN OR THE CONGRESSIONAL DISTRICT PLAN FROM THE REDISTRICTING
COMMISSION UNDER SUBSECTION (M)(2)(II) OF THIS SECTION, THE PRESIDING
OFFICERS SHALL PREPARE ANY CHANGES RECOMMENDED BY THE REDISTRICTING
COMMISSION AS AN AMENDMENT TO THE LEGISLATIVE DISTRICT PLAN OR THE
CONGRESSIONAL DISTRICT PLAN.
(2) (I) IN ORDER FOR AN AMENDMENT PREPARED UNDER
PARAGRAPH (1) OF THIS SUBSECTION TO BE PASSED, THE AMENDMENT SHALL BE
PASSED BY A VOTE OF THREE–FIFTHS OF THE MEMBERS ELECTED TO EACH HOUSE.
(II) IF AN AMENDMENT IS NOT PASSED UNDER SUBPARAGRAPH
(I) OF THIS PARAGRAPH, THE LEGISLATIVE DISTRICT PLAN OR THE CONGRESSIONAL
DISTRICT PLAN SHALL BE CONSIDERED AS NOT PASSED.
(III) AFTER AN AMENDMENT IS PASSED UNDER SUBPARAGRAPH
(I) OF THIS PARAGRAPH, IN ORDER FOR THE LEGISLATIVE DISTRICT PLAN OR THE
CONGRESSIONAL DISTRICT PLAN TO BECOME LAW, EACH HOUSE OF THE GENERAL
ASSEMBLY SHALL PASS THE LEGISLATIVE DISTRICT PLAN OR THE CONGRESSIONAL

SENATE BILL 2102
DISTRICT PLAN, AS AMENDED, BY A VOTE OF THREE–FIFTHS OF THE MEMBERS
ELECTED TO EACH HOUSE.
(3) IF THE REDISTRICTING COMMISSION SENDS THE LEGISLATIVE
DISTRICT PLAN OR THE CONGRESSIONAL DISTRICT PLAN TO THE PRESIDING
OFFICERS WITH NO CHANGES UNDER SUBSECTION (M)(2)(II) OF THIS SECTION, THE
GENERAL ASSEMBLY SHALL:
(I) RECONSIDER THE LEGISLATIVE DISTRICT PLAN OR THE
CONGRESSIONAL DISTRICT PLAN; AND
(II) IN ORDER FOR THE PLAN TO BECOME LAW, PASS THE PLAN
BY A VOTE OF THREE–FIFTHS OF THE MEMBERS ELECTED TO EACH HOUSE.
(4) EXCEPT FOR AN AMENDMENT PREPARED BY THE PRESIDING
OFFICERS UNDER PARAGRAPH (1) OF THIS SUBSECTION, THE LEGISLATIVE
DISTRICT PLAN OR THE CONGRESSIONAL DISTRICT PLAN AND AN AMENDMENT MAY
NOT BE AMENDED.
(5) THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY SHALL VOTE ON THE LEGISLATIVE
DISTRICT PLAN OR THE CONGRESSIONAL DISTRICT PLAN AND ANY AMENDMENT
WITHIN 15 DAYS AFTER THE OFFERING OF THE AMENDMENT.
(6) A REGULAR SESSION OR A SPECIAL SESSION OF THE GENERAL
ASSEMBLY SHALL BE EXTENDED, IF NEEDED, TO ALLOW FOR CONSIDERATION OF
THE LEGISLATIVE DISTRICT PLAN OR THE CONGRESSIONAL DISTRICT PLAN AND ANY
AMENDMENT IN THE TIME SET FORTH IN PARAGRAPH (5) OF THIS SUBSECTION.
(7) IF THE LEGISLATIVE DISTRICT PLAN OR THE CONGRESSIONAL
DISTRICT PLAN AND AMENDMENT DO NOT RECEIVE A VOTE OF THE MEMBERS OF
THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY WITHIN THE TIME PERIOD SET FORTH UNDER
PARAGRAPH (5) OF THIS SUBSECTION, THE LEGISLATIVE DISTRICT PLAN OR THE
CONGRESSIONAL DISTRICT PLAN AND AMENDMENT SHALL BE CONSIDERED AS NOT
PASSED.
(O) THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY SHALL PRESENT THE LEGISLATIVE DISTRICT
PLAN OR THE CONGRESSIONAL DISTRICT PLAN PASSED UNDER THIS SECTION TO
THE GOVERNOR WITHIN 1 DAY AFTER PASSAGE.
(P) (1) (I) THE GOVERNOR SHALL SIGN OR VETO THE LEGISLATIVE
DISTRICT PLAN OR THE CONGRESSIONAL DISTRICT PLAN WITHIN 6 DAYS AFTER
PRESENTMENT.

SENATE BILL 2102 11
(II) A LEGISLATIVE DISTRICT PLAN OR A CONGRESSIONAL
DISTRICT PLAN PASSED UNDER THIS SECTION MAY NOT BE ENACTED OVER THE
VETO OF THE GOVERNOR UNDER ARTICLE II, SECTION 17(D) OF THIS
CONSTITUTION.
(2) IF THE GOVERNOR DOES NOT SIGN OR VETO A PLAN WITHIN 6
DAYS AFTER PRESENTMENT, THE LEGISLATIVE DISTRICT PLAN OR THE
CONGRESSIONAL DISTRICT PLAN SHALL BE A LAW IN LIKE MANNER AS IF SIGNED BY
THE GOVERNOR.
(Q) A LEGISLATIVE DISTRICT PLAN OR A CONGRESSIONAL DISTRICT PLAN
ADOPTED UNDER THIS SECTION SHALL BECOME EFFECTIVE:
(1) ON THE DATE THE GOVERNOR SIGNS THE PLAN;
(2) IF THE GOVERNOR DOES NOT SIGN OR VETO THE PLAN, ON THE
6TH DAY AFTER PRESENTMENT TO THE GOVERNOR; OR
(3) IF THERE IS A PROCEEDING INVOLVING THE LEGISLATIVE
DISTRICT PLAN OR THE CONGRESSIONAL DISTRICT PLAN IN THE SUPREME COURT
OF MARYLAND UNDER ARTICLE IV, SECTION 14 OF THIS CONSTITUTION, ON THE
DATE ORDERED BY THE SUPREME COURT OF MARYLAND.
(R) AS PROVIDED IN ARTICLE IV, SECTION 14 OF THIS CONSTITUTION, THE
SUPREME COURT OF MARYLAND SHALL ADOPT A LEGISLATIVE DISTRICT PLAN OR
A CONGRESSIONAL DISTRICT PLAN IF:
(1) THE REDISTRICTING COMMISSION FAILS TO APPROVE A
LEGISLATIVE DISTRICT PLAN OR A CONGRESSIONAL DISTRICT PLAN;
(2) THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY DOES NOT PASS A PLAN UNDER THIS
SECTION; OR
(3) THE GOVERNOR VETOES A PLAN PASSED UNDER SUBSECTION (N)
OF THIS SECTION.
(S) THE REDISTRICTING COMMISSION SHALL BE THE REPRESENTATIVE OF
THE STATE:
(1) IN A PROCEEDING UNDER SUBSECTION (R) OF THIS SECTION; OR
(2) IN A PETITION TO REVIEW THE LEGALITY OF A PLAN UNDER
ARTICLE IV, SECTION 14 OF THIS CONSTITUTION.

SENATE BILL 2102
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That the Laws of Maryland read
as follows:
Article – Election Law
1–101.
(a) In this article the following words have the meanings indicated unless a
different meaning is clearly intended from the context.
(dd) “Majority party” means the political party to which the incumbent Governor
belongs, if the incumbent Governor is a member of a principal political party. If the
incumbent Governor is not a member of one of the two principal political parties, “majority
party” means the principal political party whose candidate for Governor received the
highest number of votes of any party candidate at the last preceding general election.
(hh) “Political party” means an organized group that is qualified as a political party
in accordance with Title 4 of this article.
(jj) “Principal minority party” means the principal political party whose candidate
for Governor received the second highest number of votes of any party candidate at the last
preceding general election.
(kk) “Principal political parties” means the majority party and the principal
minority party.
SUBTITLE 7A. LEGISLATIVE AND CONGRESSIONAL REDISTRICTING AND
APPORTIONMENT COMMISSION.
8–7A–01.
(A) IN THIS SUBTITLE THE FOLLOWING WORDS HAVE THE MEANINGS
INDICATED.
(B) “PLAN” MEANS THE PROPOSED LEGISLATIVE DISTRICT PLAN OR THE
PROPOSED CONGRESSIONAL DISTRICT PLAN ADOPTED BY THE REDISTRICTING
COMMISSION.
(C) “REDISTRICTING COMMISSION” MEANS THE LEGISLATIVE AND
CONGRESSIONAL REDISTRICTING AND APPORTIONMENT COMMISSION.
8–7A–02.
IT IS THE INTENT OF THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY THAT:

SENATE BILL 2102 13
(1) NEITHER THE LEGISLATIVE DISTRICTS NOR THE CONGRESSIONAL
DISTRICTS BE ESTABLISHED FOR THE PURPOSE OF FAVORING OR DISCRIMINATING
AGAINST AN INCUMBENT OFFICEHOLDER, A CANDIDATE FOR OFFICE, OR A
POLITICAL PARTY; AND
(2) THE PROVISIONS OF THIS SUBTITLE COMPLY WITH AND
IMPLEMENT THE PROVISIONS OF ARTICLE III, §§ 2, 3, AND 4, ARTICLE IV, § 14, AND
ARTICLE XXI, §§ 1 AND 2 OF THE MARYLAND CONSTITUTION.
8–7A–03.
THERE IS A LEGISLATIVE AND CONGRESSIONAL REDISTRICTING AND
APPORTIONMENT COMMISSION AS AN INDEPENDENT UNIT OF STATE GOVERNMENT.
8–7A–04.
(A) ON OR BEFORE MARCH 1, 2031, AND EACH YEAR ENDING IN THE
NUMERAL 1 THEREAFTER, A REDISTRICTING COMMISSION WITH THE MEMBERSHIP
ESTABLISHED IN ACCORDANCE WITH § 8–7A–05 OF THIS SUBTITLE SHALL CONVENE.
(B) THE MEMBERSHIP OF THE REDISTRICTING COMMISSION IS DESIGNED
TO PRODUCE A REDISTRICTING COMMISSION THAT IS REASONABLY
REPRESENTATIVE OF THE STATE’S GEOGRAPHICAL, RACIAL, AND GENDER MAKEUP.
8–7A–05.
(A) THE REDISTRICTING COMMISSION CONSISTS OF THE FOLLOWING 10
MEMBERS:
(1) SUBJECT TO SUBSECTION (B)(3) OF THIS SECTION, TWO MEMBERS
APPOINTED BY THE GOVERNOR, SUBJECT TO THE UNANIMOUS APPROVAL OF THE
SENATE EXECUTIVE NOMINATIONS COMMITTEE AND THE HOUSE RULES AND
EXECUTIVE NOMINATIONS COMMITTEE;
(2) THE PRESIDENT OF THE SENATE;
(3) THE SPEAKER OF THE HOUSE;
(4) THE MINORITY LEADER OF THE SENATE;
(5) THE MINORITY LEADER OF THE HOUSE OF DELEGATES;

SENATE BILL 2102
(6) ONE MEMBER APPOINTED BY THE PRESIDENT OF THE SENATE;
(7) ONE MEMBER APPOINTED BY THE SPEAKER OF THE HOUSE;
(8) ONE MEMBER APPOINTED BY THE MINORITY LEADER OF THE
SENATE; AND
(9) ONE MEMBER APPOINTED BY THE MINORITY LEADER OF THE
HOUSE OF DELEGATES.
(B) (1) AN APPOINTED MEMBER OF THE REDISTRICTING COMMISSION
MUST BE A REGISTERED VOTER WHO, FOR AT LEAST 3 YEARS IMMEDIATELY
PRECEDING THE DATE THAT THE REDISTRICTING COMMISSION CONVENES, HAS
BEEN:
(I) CONTINUOUSLY REGISTERED IN THE STATE WITH THE SAME
POLITICAL PARTY; OR
(II) CONTINUOUSLY NOT REGISTERED WITH A PRINCIPAL
POLITICAL PARTY.
(2) AN APPOINTED MEMBER OF THE REDISTRICTING COMMISSION
MAY NOT BE:
(I) A REPRESENTATIVE IN CONGRESS ELECTED FROM THE
STATE OR A CANDIDATE FOR THAT OFFICE;
(II) A MEMBER OF THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OR A CANDIDATE
FOR THAT OFFICE;
(III) AN ELECTED LOCAL GOVERNMENT OFFICIAL OR A
CANDIDATE FOR AN ELECTED LOCAL GOVERNMENT OFFICE;
(IV) AN OFFICER OR EMPLOYEE OF A POLITICAL PARTY OR
POLITICAL COMMITTEE;
(V) 1. A CONTRACTOR PROVIDING PROFESSIONAL
SERVICES TO:
A. THE GOVERNOR OR A CANDIDATE FOR THAT OFFICE;
B. A MEMBER OF THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OR A
CANDIDATE FOR THAT OFFICE; OR

SENATE BILL 2102 15
C. A REPRESENTATIVE IN CONGRESS ELECTED FROM
THE STATE OR A CANDIDATE FOR THAT OFFICE; OR
2. A CURRENT OR FORMER EMPLOYEE OF OR A
CONSULTANT TO AN INDIVIDUAL DESCRIBED IN ITEM 1 OF THIS ITEM;
(VI) AN IMMEDIATE FAMILY MEMBER OF THE GOVERNOR OR OF
AN INDIVIDUAL DESCRIBED IN ITEM (I), (II), (III), OR (IV) OF THIS PARAGRAPH;
(VII) A STAFF MEMBER OF:
1. THE GOVERNOR OR A CANDIDATE FOR THAT OFFICE;
2. A MEMBER OF THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OR A
CANDIDATE FOR THAT OFFICE;
3. A REPRESENTATIVE IN CONGRESS ELECTED FROM
THE STATE OR A CANDIDATE FOR THAT OFFICE; OR
4. AN ELECTED LOCAL GOVERNMENT OFFICIAL OR A
CANDIDATE FOR AN ELECTED LOCAL GOVERNMENT OFFICE; OR
(VIII) A CURRENT OR FORMER REGISTERED LOBBYIST.
(3) TO BE APPOINTED UNDER SUBSECTION (A)(1) OF THIS SECTION,
AN INDIVIDUAL MAY NOT BE AT THE TIME OF APPOINTMENT OR HAVE BEEN WITHIN
THE IMMEDIATELY PRECEDING 10 YEARS, AN EMPLOYEE OF:
(I) THE GOVERNOR’S OFFICE;
(II) THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY; OR
(III) AN OFFICE OF STATE GOVERNMENT.
(C) (1) THE TERM OF A MEMBER OF THE REDISTRICTING COMMISSION
EXPIRES ON FEBRUARY 28 EACH YEAR ENDING IN THE NUMERAL 1.
(2) A MEMBER OF THE REDISTRICTING COMMISSION IS NOT
ELIGIBLE TO SERVE A SUBSEQUENT TERM ON A REDISTRICTING COMMISSION.
(D) EACH MEMBER OF THE REDISTRICTING COMMISSION SHALL:

SENATE BILL 2102
(1) APPLY THE PROVISIONS OF THIS SUBTITLE IN A MANNER THAT IS
IMPARTIAL AND THAT REINFORCES PUBLIC CONFIDENCE IN THE INTEGRITY OF THE
REDISTRICTING PROCESS; AND
(2) BE INELIGIBLE FOR A PERIOD OF 5 YEARS BEGINNING FROM THE
DATE THAT THE REDISTRICTING COMMISSION CONVENES TO:
(I) HOLD APPOINTIVE FEDERAL, STATE, OR LOCAL PUBLIC
OFFICE;
(II) SERVE AS PAID STAFF FOR THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OR
ANY INDIVIDUAL MEMBER; OR
(III) REGISTER AS A STATE, COUNTY, OR MUNICIPAL LOBBYIST
IN THE STATE.
(E) A MEMBER OF THE REDISTRICTING COMMISSION:
(1) MAY NOT RECEIVE COMPENSATION AS A MEMBER OF THE
REDISTRICTING COMMISSION; BUT
(2) IS ENTITLED TO REIMBURSEMENT FOR EXPENSES UNDER THE
STANDARD STATE TRAVEL REGULATIONS, AS PROVIDED IN THE STATE BUDGET.
8–7A–06.
(A) (1) SEVEN MEMBERS OF THE REDISTRICTING COMMISSION ARE A
QUORUM.
(2) SEVEN OR MORE AFFIRMATIVE VOTES OF THE MEMBERS ARE
REQUIRED FOR ANY OFFICIAL ACTION OF THE REDISTRICTING COMMISSION,
INCLUDING APPROVAL OF:
(I) ANY PLAN FOR LEGISLATIVE DISTRICTS OR
CONGRESSIONAL DISTRICTS ADOPTED BY THE REDISTRICTING COMMISSION; AND
(II) ANY CHANGES TO AN APPROVED PLAN.
(B) FROM AMONG ITS MEMBERS, THE REDISTRICTING COMMISSION SHALL
ELECT ONE MEMBER TO SERVE AS CHAIR.
(C) (1) THE REDISTRICTING COMMISSION MAY HIRE STAFF, ATTORNEYS,
AND CONSULTANTS IN ACCORDANCE WITH THE STATE BUDGET.

SENATE BILL 2102 17
(2) EMPLOYEES OF THE REDISTRICTING COMMISSION SHALL BE
INDEPENDENT OF THE STATE PERSONNEL MANAGEMENT SYSTEM.
(D) A FINDING OF A POSSIBLE CRIMINAL VIOLATION BY A MEMBER OR AN
EMPLOYEE OF THE REDISTRICTING COMMISSION MAY RESULT IN REFERRAL TO THE
STATE PROSECUTOR FOR CRIMINAL PROSECUTION.
8–7A–07.
(A) THE REDISTRICTING COMMISSION SHALL:
(1) CONDUCT A PROCESS THAT IS OPEN AND TRANSPARENT TO
ENABLE FULL PUBLIC CONSIDERATION OF AND COMMENT ON THE ESTABLISHMENT
OF LEGISLATIVE DISTRICTS AND CONGRESSIONAL DISTRICTS;
(2) ESTABLISH LEGISLATIVE DISTRICTS AND CONGRESSIONAL
DISTRICTS ACCORDING TO THE REDISTRICTING STANDARDS SET FORTH IN THIS
SUBTITLE AND ARTICLE III, §§ 3 AND 4 AND ARTICLE XXI, § 1 OF THE MARYLAND
CONSTITUTION; AND
(3) CONDUCT BUSINESS WITH INTEGRITY AND FAIRNESS.
(B) THE ACTIVITIES OF THE REDISTRICTING COMMISSION ARE SUBJECT TO
THE OPEN MEETINGS ACT AND THE MARYLAND PUBLIC INFORMATION ACT.
(C) (1) THE REDISTRICTING COMMISSION SHALL ESTABLISH AND
IMPLEMENT A HEARING PROCESS THAT IS OPEN TO THE PUBLIC FOR PUBLIC INPUT
AND DELIBERATION THAT IS:
(I) SUBJECT TO PUBLIC NOTICE; AND
(II) DESIGNED TO ENCOURAGE CITIZEN OUTREACH AND TO
SOLICIT BROAD PUBLIC PARTICIPATION IN THE REDISTRICTING PROCESS.
(2) (I) THE HEARING PROCESS ESTABLISHED UNDER PARAGRAPH
(1) OF THIS SUBSECTION SHALL INCLUDE THE SCHEDULING OF HEARINGS:
1. TO RECEIVE PUBLIC INPUT BEFORE THE
CONSIDERATION OF ANY PLAN BY THE REDISTRICTING COMMISSION; AND
2. FOLLOWING THE PROPOSAL OF A PLAN BY THE
REDISTRICTING COMMISSION.

SENATE BILL 2102
(II) HEARINGS MAY BE SUPPLEMENTED WITH OTHER
ACTIVITIES AS DETERMINED APPROPRIATE BY THE REDISTRICTING COMMISSION
TO FURTHER INCREASE OPPORTUNITIES FOR THE PUBLIC TO OBSERVE AND
PARTICIPATE IN THE REDISTRICTING PROCESS.
(D) (1) THE REDISTRICTING COMMISSION SHALL ENSURE THAT THE
PROPOSED PLANS ARE READILY ACCESSIBLE TO THE PUBLIC.
(2) BEFORE ADOPTING A PLAN, THE REDISTRICTING COMMISSION
SHALL ALLOW 14 DAYS FOR THE PUBLIC TO PROVIDE WRITTEN COMMENT.
(E) THE REDISTRICTING COMMISSION SHALL TAKE ALL STEPS NECESSARY
TO ENSURE THAT A COMPLETE AND ACCURATE COMPUTERIZED POPULATION
DATABASE IS AVAILABLE FOR REDISTRICTING AND THAT PROCEDURES ARE IN
PLACE TO PROVIDE THE PUBLIC READY ACCESS TO REDISTRICTING DATA AND
COMPUTER SOFTWARE FOR DRAWING MAPS.
8–7A–08.
(A) (1) IN THE YEAR FOLLOWING EACH DECENNIAL CENSUS OF THE
UNITED STATES, OR WHEN OTHERWISE REQUIRED BY LAW, THE REDISTRICTING
COMMISSION SHALL ADOPT A PLAN TO ESTABLISH LEGISLATIVE DISTRICTS AND
CONGRESSIONAL DISTRICTS IN CONFORMANCE WITH THE STANDARDS AND
PROCESSES SET FORTH IN THIS SUBTITLE AND THE MARYLAND CONSTITUTION.
(2) ON OR BEFORE OCTOBER 1 EACH YEAR ENDING IN THE NUMERAL
1, THE REDISTRICTING COMMISSION SHALL APPROVE TWO PLANS:
(I) ONE PLAN SHALL DESCRIBE THE DISTRICT BOUNDARY
LINES FOR THE ELECTION OF MEMBERS OF THE SENATE AND THE HOUSE OF
DELEGATES; AND
(II) ONE PLAN SHALL DESCRIBE THE DISTRICT BOUNDARY
LINES FOR THE STATE’S REPRESENTATIVES IN CONGRESS.
(B) LEGISLATIVE DISTRICTS SHALL BE NUMBERED CONSECUTIVELY
COMMENCING AT THE NORTHWESTERN BOUNDARY OF THE STATE AND ENDING AT
THE SOUTHEASTERN BOUNDARY OF THE STATE.
(C) THE REDISTRICTING COMMISSION SHALL ISSUE WITH EACH PLAN:
(1) MAPS SHOWING THE LEGISLATIVE DISTRICTS AND THE

SENATE BILL 2102 19
CONGRESSIONAL DISTRICTS; AND
(2) A REPORT THAT:
(I) EXPLAINS THE BASIS ON WHICH THE REDISTRICTING
COMMISSION MADE ITS DECISIONS TO ACHIEVE COMPLIANCE WITH THE CRITERIA
SPECIFIED UNDER THIS SUBTITLE; AND
(II) INCLUDES DEFINITIONS OF THE TERMS AND STANDARDS
USED IN DRAWING EACH PLAN.
(D) ON ADOPTION OF A PLAN, THE REDISTRICTING COMMISSION SHALL:
(1) CERTIFY THAT THE PLAN IS THE PLAN ADOPTED BY THE
REDISTRICTING COMMISSION; AND
(2) SEND THE CERTIFIED PLAN TO THE PRESIDING OFFICERS OF THE
GENERAL ASSEMBLY.
(E) ON RECEIPT OF A CERTIFIED PLAN SENT UNDER SUBSECTION (D) OF
THIS SECTION, THE PRESIDING OFFICERS SHALL PREPARE THE PLAN FOR
CONSIDERATION BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY AS PROVIDED IN ARTICLE XXI, § 2 OF
THE MARYLAND CONSTITUTION.
(F) EXCEPT AS PROVIDED IN THIS SUBTITLE OR ARTICLE XXI, § 2 OF THE
MARYLAND CONSTITUTION, A PLAN CONSIDERED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY
SHALL BE TREATED IN THE SAME MANNER AS A BILL FOR PURPOSES OF
PUBLICATION, CODIFICATION, NOTIFICATION, AND DISTRIBUTION.
8–7A–09.
(A) THE REDISTRICTING COMMISSION SHALL PETITION THE SUPREME
COURT OF MARYLAND TO ESTABLISH LEGISLATIVE DISTRICTS OR CONGRESSIONAL
DISTRICTS ACCORDING TO THE STANDARDS SET FORTH IN THIS SUBTITLE AND
ARTICLE III, §§ 3 AND 4 AND ARTICLE XXI OF THE MARYLAND CONSTITUTION IF:
(1) THE REDISTRICTING COMMISSION FAILS TO ADOPT AND CERTIFY
A PLAN UNDER THIS SUBTITLE; OR
(2) A PLAN IS NOT ENACTED IN ACCORDANCE WITH ARTICLE XXI, § 2
OF THE MARYLAND CONSTITUTION.
(B) THE REDISTRICTING COMMISSION SHALL REPRESENT THE STATE

SENATE BILL 2102
REGARDING ANY PETITION SEEKING A REVIEW OF A CERTIFIED PLAN OR A LAW
ENACTED ESTABLISHING LEGISLATIVE DISTRICTS OR CONGRESSIONAL DISTRICTS
UNDER ARTICLE XXI, § 2 OF THE MARYLAND CONSTITUTION.
(C) IN ANY CASE BROUGHT IN A FEDERAL COURT TO REVIEW A PLAN, IF THE
REDISTRICTING COMMISSION IS NOT A PARTY TO THE CASE, THE REDISTRICTING
COMMISSION SHALL MOVE TO INTERVENE IN THE CASE ON BEHALF OF THE STATE.
8–7A–10.
(A) THE SUPREME COURT OF MARYLAND SHALL HAVE ORIGINAL
JURISDICTION TO ESTABLISH LEGISLATIVE DISTRICTS AND CONGRESSIONAL
DISTRICTS ACCORDING TO THE STANDARDS SET FORTH IN THIS SUBTITLE AND
ARTICLE III, §§ 3 AND 4 AND ARTICLE XXI OF THE MARYLAND CONSTITUTION IF:
(1) THE REDISTRICTING COMMISSION FAILS TO APPROVE A PLAN
UNDER THIS SUBTITLE;
(2) A PLAN IS NOT ENACTED UNDER ARTICLE XXI, § 2 OF THE
MARYLAND CONSTITUTION; OR
(3) A REGISTERED VOTER FILES A PETITION UNDER SUBSECTION (B)
OF THIS SECTION.
(B) (1) ON THE ENACTMENT OF A LEGISLATIVE DISTRICT PLAN OR A
CONGRESSIONAL DISTRICT PLAN, ANY REGISTERED VOTER IN THE STATE MAY FILE
A PETITION WITH THE SUPREME COURT OF MARYLAND TO BAR THE PLAN FROM
TAKING EFFECT ON THE GROUNDS THAT THE PLAN VIOLATES THE MARYLAND
CONSTITUTION, THE UNITED STATES CONSTITUTION, OR A FEDERAL OR STATE
STATUTE.
(2) THE REDISTRICTING COMMISSION SHALL BE THE DEFENDANT IN
A PETITION FILED UNDER PARAGRAPH (1) OF THIS SUBSECTION.
(C) SUBJECT TO THE MARYLAND RULES, ANY REGISTERED VOTER OF THE
STATE MAY PARTICIPATE IN THE PROCEEDING AS AN AMICUS CURIAE.
(D) (1) IF A PETITION IS FILED UNDER SUBSECTION (B) OF THIS SECTION,
THE SUPREME COURT OF MARYLAND:
(I) SHALL SET DEADLINES FOR THE FILING OF PLEADINGS AND
AMICUS CURIAE BRIEFS; AND

SENATE BILL 2102 21
(II) MAY APPOINT A SPECIAL MASTER TO MAKE
RECOMMENDATIONS.
(2) A SPECIAL MASTER APPOINTED UNDER PARAGRAPH (1) OF THIS
SUBSECTION SHALL:
(I) HOLD A HEARING;
(II) CONSIDER A PLAN APPROVED BY THE REDISTRICTING
COMMISSION, IF ANY; AND
(III) MAKE RECOMMENDATIONS TO THE SUPREME COURT OF
MARYLAND.
(3) WITHIN THE TIME PERIOD ESTABLISHED BY THE SUPREME
COURT OF MARYLAND UNDER PARAGRAPH (1) OF THIS SUBSECTION, A PARTY MAY
FILE EXCEPTIONS TO THE RECOMMENDATIONS OF THE SPECIAL MASTER.
(4) BEFORE ORDERING ANY RELIEF, THE SUPREME COURT OF
MARYLAND SHALL:
(I) HOLD A HEARING;
(II) CONSIDER A PLAN APPROVED BY THE REDISTRICTING
COMMISSION, IF ANY; AND
(III) CONSIDER ANY RECOMMENDATIONS OF A SPECIAL MASTER.
(E) (1) THE SUPREME COURT OF MARYLAND MAY ORDER ANY RELIEF
CONSIDERED APPROPRIATE.
(2) IN ORDERING RELIEF:
(I) IF THE REDISTRICTING COMMISSION ADOPTED AND
CERTIFIED A PLAN, THE SUPREME COURT OF MARYLAND MAY APPROVE, MODIFY,
OR ADOPT A NEW PLAN; OR
(II) IF THE REDISTRICTING COMMISSION HAS NOT ADOPTED
AND CERTIFIED A PLAN, THE SUPREME COURT OF MARYLAND SHALL ESTABLISH
LEGISLATIVE DISTRICTS AND CONGRESSIONAL DISTRICTS ACCORDING TO THE
STANDARDS SET FORTH IN THIS SUBTITLE AND ARTICLE III, §§ 3 AND 4 AND
ARTICLE XXI OF THE MARYLAND CONSTITUTION.

SENATE BILL 2102
(F) THE SUPREME COURT OF MARYLAND SHALL GIVE PRIORITY TO RULING
ON A PETITION FILED UNDER THIS SECTION.
8–7A–11.
THE GOVERNOR SHALL INCLUDE FUNDS IN THE STATE BUDGET TO CARRY
OUT THE PROVISIONS OF THIS SUBTITLE, INCLUDING THE COSTS OF ANY
LITIGATION.
SECTION 3. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That the General Assembly
determines that the amendment to the Maryland Constitution proposed by Section 1 of this
Act affects multiple jurisdictions and that the provisions of Article XIV, § 1 of the Maryland
Constitution concerning local approval of constitutional amendments do not apply.
SECTION 4. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That the amendment to the
Maryland Constitution proposed by Section 1 of this Act shall be submitted to the qualified
voters of the State at the next general election to be held in November 2026 for adoption or
rejection in accordance with Article XIV of the Maryland Constitution. At that general
election, the vote on the proposed amendment to the Constitution shall be by ballot, and on
each ballot there shall be printed the words “For the Constitutional Amendment” and
“Against the Constitutional Amendment”, as now provided by law. Immediately after the
election, all returns shall be made to the Governor of the vote for and against the proposed
amendment, as directed by Article XIV of the Maryland Constitution, and further
proceedings held in accordance with Article XIV.
SECTION 5. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That Section 2 of this Act is
contingent on the passage of Section 1 of this Act, a constitutional amendment, and its
ratification by the voters of the State.
SECTION 6. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That, subject to Section 5 of this
Act, Section 2 of this Act shall take effect on the proclamation of the Governor that the
constitutional amendment, having received a majority of the votes cast at the general
election, has been adopted by the people of Maryland.